Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,134
Tax Commissioner; destroy obsolete returns, when.

Unless specifically provided for in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, after any period of limitations fixed by such act, the Tax Commissioner may destroy obsolete returns.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 134, p. 1637.